Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4795.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 861. Within Not later than 10 days after the date of the official canvass of the consolidation election, the intermediate school board of the intermediate school district containing the territory of the consolidated school district shall appoint school electors of the school district in the number required by under section 11a to act as a board for the school district. This board shall continue to operate the affected school districts as separate school districts until the effective date of the consolidation. If a consolidated school district includes territory in more than 1 intermediate school district, the appointment shall must be made by the intermediate school board of each intermediate school district acting jointly as a single board. Within Not later than 7 days after appointment, each member shall file with the intermediate superintendent an acceptance of the office, accompanied by a written affidavit setting forth the fact of eligibility for office. Each appointed board member shall hold office until January 1, or, if the consolidated school district's regular election is in May, until July 1, next following the appointment. A new board shall must be elected at the first regular school election held after the effective date of consolidation in the manner prescribed by law for the election of a first board. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4793 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.